Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-505
Violations; penalty.

A violation of section 76-502 or 76-504 shall be a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1907, c. 98, § 1, p. 347;

Laws 1911, c. 99, § 1, p. 364;

R.S.1913, § 6277;

C.S.1922, § 5691;

C.S.1929, § 76-601;

Laws 1933, c. 125, § 1, p. 499;

Laws 1935, c. 148, § 1, p. 551;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-601;

R.S.1943, § 76-505;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 4.